apertium-fin-eng.fin.lexc
LEXICON N_ELÄIN

%<sg%>%<nom%>:n  N_POSSES? ;
0:me N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:me N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:me N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:m N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:m N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:m N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0:m N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:m N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON N_AIKA

%<sg%>%<nom%>:ika  N_POSSES? ;
0:ja N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:ika N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:ika N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_AN ;
0:jo N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:iko N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:iko N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0:iko N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_JEN ;
0:iko N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON N_PÖYTÄ

%<sg%>%<nom%>:t%{A%}  N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:t%{A%}%{A%}  N_POSSES? ;
0:d%{A%} N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:t%{A%} N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:t%{A%} N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_AN ;
0:d N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:t N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:t N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0:t N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:t N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON N_KOIRA

%<sg%>%<nom%>:%{A%}  N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:%{A%}%{A%}  N_POSSES? ;
0:%{A%} N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:%{A%} N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:%{A%} N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_AN ;
0 N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0 N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0 N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0 N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0 N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON N_AALTO
%<sg%>%<nom%>:to N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:toa N_POSSES? ;
0:lo N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:to N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:to N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_ON ;
0:lo N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:to N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:to N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0:to N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_JEN ;
0:to N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON N_VENE
%<sg%>%<nom%>:0 N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:tt%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
0:e N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:e N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:e N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_SEEN ;
0:e N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:e N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:e N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_ITA ;
0:e N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IDEN ;
0:eis N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON N_TUPA
%<sg%>%<nom%>:pa N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:paa N_POSSES? ;
0:va N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:pa N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:pa N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_AN ;
0:v N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:p N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:p N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0:p N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:p N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON N_MAAKRAPU
%<sg%>%<nom%>:pu N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:pua N_POSSES? ;
0:vu N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:pu N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:pu N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_UN ;
0:vu N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:pu N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:pu N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0:pu N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_JEN ;
0:pu N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON N_VERI
%<sg%>%<nom%>:i N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:ta N_POSSES? ;
0:e N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:e N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:e N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0 N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0 N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0 N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0 N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0 N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON N_ILTA
%<sg%>%<nom%>:ta N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:taa N_POSSES? ;
0:la N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:ta N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:ta N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_AN ;
0:lo N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:to N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:to N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_JA ;
0:to N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_JEN ;
0:to N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN ;

LEXICON N_RUOKA
%<sg%>%<nom%>:ka N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:kaa N_POSSES? ;
0:a N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:ka N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:ka N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_AN ;
0: N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:k N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:k N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0:k N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
0:k N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON N_NIEMI
%<sg%>%<nom%>:mi N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:nt%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<par%>:me%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
0:me N_SINGULARS_WEAK ;
0:me N_SINGULARS_STRONG ;
0:me N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_EN ;
0:m N_PLURALS_WEAK ;
0:m N_PLURALS_STRONG ;
0:m N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA ;
0:m N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN ;
! Not implemented yet
!0:n N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_TEN ;
0:m N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN ;

LEXICON N_SINGULARS_WEAK

%<pl%>%<nom%>:t N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:n N_CLITS? ;
%<sg%>%<ine%>:ss%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<ela%>:st%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<ade%>:ll%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<abl%>:lt%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<all%>:lle N_POSSES? ;
%<sg%>%<tra%>:ksi N_CLITS? ;
%<sg%>%<tra%>:kse N_POSSES ;
%<sg%>%<abe%>:tt%{A%} N_POSSES? ;

LEXICON N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_AN
%<sg%>%<ill%>:%{A%} N_POSSES ;
%<sg%>%<ill%>:%{A%}n N_CLITS? ;

LEXICON N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_EN
%<sg%>%<ill%>:e N_POSSES ;
%<sg%>%<ill%>:en N_CLITS? ;

LEXICON N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_IN
%<sg%>%<ill%>:i N_POSSES ;
%<sg%>%<ill%>:in N_CLITS? ;

LEXICON N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_ON
%<sg%>%<ill%>:%{O%} N_POSSES ;
%<sg%>%<ill%>:%{O%}n N_CLITS? ;

LEXICON N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_UN
%<sg%>%<ill%>:%{U%} N_POSSES ;
%<sg%>%<ill%>:%{U%}n N_CLITS? ;

LEXICON N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_HUN
%<sg%>%<ill%>:h%{U%} N_POSSES ;
%<sg%>%<ill%>:h%{U%}n N_CLITS? ;

LEXICON N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_HAN
%<sg%>%<ill%>:h%{A%} N_POSSES ;
%<sg%>%<ill%>:h%{A%}n N_CLITS? ;

LEXICON N_SINGULAR_ILLATIVE_SEEN
%<sg%>%<ill%>:see N_POSSES ;
%<sg%>%<ill%>:seen N_CLITS? ;

LEXICON N_SINGULARS_STRONG

%<sg%>%<nom%>:0 N_POSSES ;
%<pl%>%<nom%>:0 N_POSSES ;
%<sg%>%<gen%>:0 N_POSSES ;
%<sg%>%<ess%>:n%{A%} N_POSSES? ;

LEXICON N_PLURALS_WEAK

%<pl%>%<ine%>:iss%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
%<pl%>%<ela%>:ist%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
%<pl%>%<ade%>:ill%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
%<pl%>%<abl%>:ill%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
%<pl%>%<all%>:ille N_POSSES? ;
%<pl%>%<tra%>:iksi N_CLITS? ;
%<pl%>%<tra%>:ikse N_POSSES ;
%<pl%>%<abe%>:itt%{A%} N_POSSES? ;
%<pl%>%<ins%>:in N_POSSES? ;

LEXICON N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_JA

%<pl%>%<par%>:j%{A%} N_POSSES? ;

LEXICON N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_ITA

%<pl%>%<par%>:it%{A%} N_POSSES? ;

LEXICON N_PLURAL_PARTITIVE_IA

%<pl%>%<par%>:i%{A%} N_POSSES? ;

LEXICON N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_JEN

%<pl%>%<gen%>:je N_POSSES ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:jen N_CLITS? ;

LEXICON N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_ITTEN

%<pl%>%<gen%>:itte N_POSSES ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:itten N_CLITS? ;

LEXICON N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IEN

%<pl%>%<gen%>:ie N_POSSES ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:ien N_CLITS? ;

LEXICON N_PLURAL_GENITIVE_IDEN

%<pl%>%<gen%>:ide N_POSSES ;
%<pl%>%<gen%>:iden N_CLITS? ;

LEXICON N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IHIN

%<pl%>%<ill%>:ii N_POSSES ;
%<pl%>%<ill%>:iin N_CLITS? ;

LEXICON N_PLURAL_ILLATIVE_IIN

%<pl%>%<ill%>:ii N_POSSES ;
%<pl%>%<ill%>:iin N_CLITS? ;

LEXICON N_PLURALS_STRONG

%<pl%>%<com%>:ine N_POSSES? ;
%<pl%>%<ess%>:in%{A%} N_POSSES? ;

LEXICON N_POSSES?
0   N_CLITS?    ;
0   N_POSSES    ;

LEXICON N_POSSES
%<px1sg%>:ni N_CLITS? ;
%<px2sg%>:si N_CLITS? ;
%<px3sp%>:ns%{A%} N_CLITS? ;
%<px1pl%>:mme N_CLITS? ;
%<px2pl%>:nne N_CLITS? ;

LEXICON N_CLITS?
0   # ;
0   N_CLITS ;

LEXICON N_CLITS

%+ko%<qst%>:k%{O%} # ;


LEXICON V_NEG
ei%<vblex%>%<neg%>%<p1%>%<sg%>:en # ;
ei%<vblex%>%<neg%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:et # ;
ei%<vblex%>%<neg%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:ei # ;
ja%<cnjcoo%>+ei%<vblex%>%<neg%>%<p3%>%<sg%>:eikä # ;
ei%<vblex%>%<neg%>%<p1%>%<pl%>:emme # ;
ei%<vblex%>%<neg%>%<p2%>%<pl%>:ette # ;
ei%<vblex%>%<neg%>%<p3%>%<pl%>:eivät # ;
ei%<vblex%>%<neg%>%<imp%>%<p2%>%<sg%>:älä # ;

LEXICON V_VOIDA
%<inf%>:ida # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:i V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:i V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:0 V_PRESENT_SG3_I ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:i V_PASSIVE_D ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_PAST_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:0 V_COND ;
%<actv%>:i  V_NUT ;

LEXICON V_NUKKUA

%<inf%>:kua # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:u V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:ku V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:ku V_PRESENT_SG3_U ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:u V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:u V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ku V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_TÄYTYÄ

%<inf%>:tyä # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:dy V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:ty V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:ty V_PRESENT_SG3_U ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:dy V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:dy V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:ty V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_TUNTEA
%<inf%>:tea # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:ne V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:te V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:te V_PRESENT_SG3_E ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:ne V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:s V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:s V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON V_TIETÄÄ

%<inf%>:tää # ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:d%{A%} V_PRESENT_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:t%{A%} V_PRESENT_STRONG ;
%<actv%>%<pres%>:t%{A%} V_PRESENT_SG3_A ;
%<pasv%>%<pres%>:de V_PASSIVE_T ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:s V_PAST_WEAK ;
%<actv%>%<past%>:s V_PAST_STRONG ;

LEXICON Nouns
aalto%<n%>:aal N_AALTO ; ! "wave"
aika%<n%>:a N_AIKA ; ! "time"
eläin%<n%>:eläi N_ELÄIN ; ! "animal"
ilta%<n%>:il N_ILTA ; ! "evening"
isä%<n%>:is N_KOIRA ; ! "father"
järjestelmä%<n%>:järjestelm N_KOIRA ; ! "system"
koira%<n%>:koir N_KOIRA ; ! "dog"
kesä%<n%>:kes N_KOIRA ; ! "summer"
maakrapu%<n%>:maakra N_MAAKRAPU ; ! "landlubber"
niemi%<n%>:nie N_NIEMI ; ! "cape, small peninsula
pöytä%<n%>:pöy N_PÖYTÄ ; ! "table"
ruoka%<n%>:ruo N_RUOKA ; ! "food"
silmä%<n%>:silm N_KOIRA ; ! "eye"
tupa%<n%>:tu N_TUPA ; ! "cottage/room"
meri%<n%>:mer N_VERI ; ! "sea"
veri%<n%>:ver N_VERI ; ! "blood"
vene%<n%>:vene N_VENE ; ! "boat"
LEXICON Verbs
0 V_NEG ; ! "no"
nukkua%<vblex%>:nuk V_NUKKUA ; ! "sleep"
tietää%<vblex%>:tie V_TIETÄÄ ; ! "know"
tuntea%<vblex%>:tun V_TUNTEA ; ! "feel, know someone"
täytyä%<vaux%>:täy V_TÄYTYÄ ; ! "must"
voida%<vaux%>:vo V_VOIDA ; ! "can"
